South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-2210 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-3-2210. (A) Every motor vehicle as herein defined which is over twenty-five years old, is owned solely as a collector's item and is used for participation in club activities, exhibits, tours, parades, and similar uses, but in no event used for general transportation, may be classified by the Department of Motor Vehicles as an antique motor vehicle. (B) An antique motor vehicle may be used at night for the purposes identified in subsection (A) so long as the vehicle is equipped with working headlights and rear lights. SECTION 2.  Section 56-3-2230 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-3-2230. (a)(A) Every motorcycle over twenty-five years old, which is owned solely as a collector's item and is used for participation in club activities, exhibits, tours, parades and similar uses, but is not used for general transportation, may be classified by the Department of Motor Vehicles as an antique motorcycle. (b)(B) Upon receipt of an application on a form prescribed by the Department, it may issue appropriately designated license plates to owners of antique motorcycles. An antique motorcycle license plate shall be valid as long as title to the motorcycle is vested in the applicant. The fee for the certificate of registration and license plate of any such motorcycle shall be ten dollars. (C) An antique motorcycle may be used at night for the purposes identified in subsection (A) so long as the motorcycle is equipped with working headlights and rear lights. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----